Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Purchase of Sidearms by Retiring Law Enforcement Personnel

§ 45-9-131.
Purchase of sidearm by retiring law enforcement officer or spouse of law enforcement officer killed in line of duty.

Upon approval of the governing authority of the municipality or county, a member of any municipal or county law enforcement agency who retires under any state retirement system or the spouse of a law enforcement officer who is killed in the line of duty may be allowed to purchase as his or her personal property one (1) sidearm which was issued to the law enforcement officer by the law enforcement agency from which he or she retired or by whom he or she was employed at the time of death. The governing authority of the municipality or county shall determine the amount to be paid for the firearm by the retiring member of the law enforcement agency or the spouse of the law enforcement officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 462, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 381, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2013.).

§ 45-9-133.
Retention of sidearm by retiring law enforcement officer of Mississippi Department of Transportation.

Each person employed as a law enforcement officer by the Mississippi Department of Transportation who retires for superannuation or for reason of disability under the Public Employees’ Retirement System shall be allowed to retain as his personal property, one (1) sidearm which was issued to such law enforcement officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 550, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 28, 2010.).